Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 4

State-Aid Highway System

54-4-401. Establishment of system.

The commissioner is authorized to establish a state-aid highway system in cooperation with local officials.

Acts 1983, ch. 320, § 2; T.C.A., § 54-6-201.

Cited: Austin v. State, 796 S.W.2d 449, 1990 Tenn. LEXIS 299 (Tenn. 1990).

Comparative Legislation. State funds for local aid:

Ala. Code § 23-1-100 et seq.

Ark. Code § 27-72-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 32-5-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 178.150.

Miss. Code Ann. § 65-9-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 231.450 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 136-66.1.

Va. Code § 33.1-23.01 et seq.

Collateral References. Highways
90 et seq.

54-4-402. Powers and duties of commissioner.

The commissioner has full power, and it is made the duty of the commissioner, after consultation with local officials, to designate those highways and roads that are considered of sufficient importance to be included in the state-aid highway system. In the selection and designation of highways and roads as part of the state-aid highway system, the commissioner shall consider any highways and roads that are not a part of the state highway system, the number of miles of highways and roads in each county, and the area and population of each county, traffic volume, type of traffic, land use, and function that each route serves in the county road network.

After consulting with local officials, the commissioner may make adjustments in the system that appear to be necessary as a result of any change in local conditions and traffic patterns as shown by studies and data of the planning division of the department.

The commissioner is authorized to lease to local officials any equipment of the department.

Acts 1983, ch. 320, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A., § 54-6-202.

54-4-403. Annual program of work.

When the state-aid highway system has been designated as provided in § 54-4-402, the local authorities having authority over the selected roads shall submit an annual program to the department specifying the type of work to be performed in the local entity on the state-aid highway system. The types of qualifying work may include the planning, engineering, right-of-way acquisition, construction, improvement, and rehabilitation of roads and bridges. Upon approval of this annual program by the commissioner, within the funds allocated for the local agency, the program of work shall be carried out as provided in this part.

Acts 1983, ch. 320, § 2; T.C.A., § 54-6-203.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 7.

54-4-404. Allocation and expenditure of funds — Matching funds — Bridge replacement.

Funds appropriated to the state-aid highway system shall be allocated to the local agencies to be expended upon the designated highways and roads by the same formula as is set forth in § 54-4-103.

No funds shall be either obligated or expended under this program unless the local agency agrees to match the proposed expenditures in an amount of twenty-five percent (25%). All of the required match or a portion of the match may be provided by in-kind contributions.

A local agency may choose to transfer up to fifty percent (50%) of its funds allocated for the state-aid highway system to its state off-system bridge replacement program, in which case the matching requirements for bridge replacement projects as set forth in Acts 1982, ch. 916, § 11, Item 48, shall apply. It may choose to transfer up to that amount to participate in the federal-aid bridge replacement and rehabilitation program.

If any county has an unexpended balance of funds that have accrued in the state treasury and that are available for the benefit of the county under this part, then the county may use the unexpended balance, in whole or in part, to provide a portion of the local agency share required by subsection (b); provided, that the county shall provide at least two percent (2%) of the approved project costs from county funds or in-kind project work approved by the commissioner of transportation, or both.

Acts 1983, ch. 320, § 2; 1985, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A., § 54-6-204; Acts 2015, ch. 195, § 2; 2017, ch. 442, §§ 1, 2; 2019, ch. 129, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1982, ch. 916, referred to in this section, is the Appropriations Act of 1982.

Acts 2015, ch. 195, § 1 provided that the act, which added (d), shall be known and may be cited as the "County Road Relief Act of 2015".

Acts 2015, ch. 195, § 3 provided that nothing in the act, which added (d), shall be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to this act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (d).

The 2017 amendment, in (d)(1), substituted “2015-2016, 2016-2017, 2017-2018, or 2018-2019” for “2015-2016 or 2016-2017” at the end; and, in (d)(2), substituted “2019” for “2017” following “July 1,”.

The 2019 amendment, in (d), deleted former (2) which read: “This subsection (d) is deleted on July 1, 2019, and shall no longer be effective on and after such date.”, and, deleted the former proviso at the end of present (d) which read: “; provided, further, that the county shall initiate the project during fiscal years 2015-2016, 2016-2017, 2017-2018, or 2018-2019”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 195, § 4. April 22, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 442, § 3. May 25, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 129, § 2. April 9, 2019.

54-4-405. Methods of work.

Work authorized by this part shall be done in one (1) of the following methods:

Upon request of local officials, the department may agree and is fully empowered to act as agent for the local agency to carry out any phase of work authorized on the state-aid highway system;

All preconstruction activities may be performed by the local agency if accomplished in compliance with reasonable standards, which shall be established by the department; or

The construction of highways and roads provided for by this part shall be done in one (1) of the following methods:

By award of a construction contract by a local agency in accordance with procedures approved by the department, which shall include advertisement in a newspaper having circulation in the county in which the work is to be done for at least two (2) weekly issues prior to the date of accepting bids and compliance with a competitive bid procedure consistent with existing laws for the awarding of highway or road construction contracts; or

In accordance with a negotiated contract between the department and a local agency based upon unit prices to be established by the department; provided, that the department may prescribe rules and regulations necessary to ensure that counties with whom contracts are executed are equipped and qualified to do the work.

Acts 1983, ch. 320, § 2; T.C.A., § 54-6-205.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 28.

54-4-406. Maintenance of roads.

Any road designated as a part of the state-aid highway system shall be maintained by the local agency in which the highway or road is located.

Acts 1983, ch. 320, § 2; T.C.A., § 54-6-206; Acts 1991, ch. 133, § 4.